Utah statutes.
10-8-69.   Annoying pastimes in streets.

They may prohibit or regulate the rolling of hoops, playing of ball, flying of kites, riding of bicycles or tricycles, or any other amusements or practices having a tendency to annoy persons passing in the streets or on sidewalks, or to frighten teams of horses, or to interfere with traffic.



No Change Since 1953

